New York, session 2025-2026, A10543.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 2803 of the public health law is amended by adding 2 a new subdivision 15 to read as follows: 3 15. (a) The commissioner shall ensure that all healthcare facilities 4 as defined in paragraph (b) of this subdivision possess and maintain an 5 operating threshold of at least fifty percent of all healthcare protec- 6 tive textiles (HPT) as provided by a hygienically clean laundry service 7 provider; provided, however, that upon request, the department may grant 8 an extension or reprieve, at its sole and exclusive discretion if the 9 healthcare facility demonstrates, to the commissioner's satisfaction, 10 that such healthcare facility's inability to meet such requirement is 11 solely attributable to supply chain issues that are beyond the hospi- 12 tal's control and purchasing HPT at market rates would facilitate price 13 gouging by HPT vendors. 14 (b) For purposes of this subdivision, the following terms shall have 15 the following meanings: 16 (i) "healthcare facility" shall mean hospitals, skilled nursing facil- 17 ities, outpatient care centers, long-term care facilities, physical 18 therapy centers, comprehensive outpatient rehabilitation facilities, 19 end-stage renal disease facilities, hospice, physician's offices, non- 20 physician provider's offices, and laboratories; 21 (ii) "healthcare protective textiles" shall mean reusable textiles 22 designed to protect healthcare workers, patients, and support personnel 23 against exposure to infectious agents, bodily fluids, hazardous chemi- 24 cals, and other clinical risks by resisting fluid and viral penetration EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD06988-07-6 A. 10543--B 2 1 and cross-contamination, including: underpads, lab coats, cubicle 2 curtains, barrier gowns as classified by AAMI/ANSI PB70 liquid barrier 3 performance levels (1-4), surgical gowns as classified by AAMI/ANSI PB70 4 liquid barrier performance levels (1-4), and isolation gowns as classi- 5 fied by AAMI/ANSI PB70 liquid barrier performance levels (1-4); and 6 (iii) "operating threshold" shall mean a constantly rotating stock of 7 HPT textiles being used, returned to a laundry facility, processed by a 8 hygienically clean certified facility, and returned to a healthcare 9 facility for use. 10 (c) Failure to possess and maintain such a supply of HPT may result in 11 a fine to be determined by the department; provided, however, that no 12 such revocation or suspension shall be ordered unless the department has 13 provided the healthcare facility with a thirty-day grace period, to 14 achieve compliance with the requirements of paragraph (a) of this subdi- 15 vision. 16 § 2. This act shall take effect one year after it shall have become a 17 law.